Vermont statutes. Title 11 Corporations, Partnerships, and Associations
Chapter 16. Business Rapid Response to Declared State Disasters

§ 1701.
Definitions.

In this chapter:

“Critical infrastructure” means property and equipment owned or used by communications networks and electric generation, transmission, and distribution systems.

“Declared State disaster or emergency” means:
(2) (A) “Declared State disaster or emergency” means:

a disaster or emergency event for which a Governor’s state of emergency proclamation has been issued;

a disaster or emergency event for which a Presidential declaration of a federal major disaster or emergency has been issued; or

a disaster or emergency event within the State for which a good faith response effort is required, and for which the Commissioner of Public Service is given notification from the registered business and the Commissioner, in consultation with the Director of Emergency Management, Department of Public Safety, designates the event as a disaster or emergency, thereby invoking the provisions of this chapter.

“Declared State disaster or emergency” does not include an emergency or situation arising solely from a labor dispute.

“Disaster response period” means a period that begins 10 days prior to the first day of the Governor’s proclamation, the President’s declaration, or designation by another authorized official of the State as set forth in this chapter, whichever occurs first, and that extends 60 calendar days after the declared State disaster or emergency.

“Disaster- or emergency-related work” means repairing, renovating, installing, building, rendering services, or other nonretail business activities in areas of the State affected by the declared State disaster or emergency that relate to critical infrastructure that has been damaged, impaired, or destroyed by the declared State disaster or emergency.

“Mutual Assistance Agreement” means an agreement to which one or more registered businesses and one or more out-of-state businesses are party and pursuant to which an electric or telephone utility may request and receive assistance from an out-of-state business for performance of disaster- or emergency-related work by the out-of-state business during the disaster response period.

“Out-of-state business” means a business entity that, except for disaster- or emergency-related work, has no presence in the State and conducts no business in the State whose services are requested pursuant to a Mutual Assistance Agreement by a registered business or by a State or local government for purposes of performing disaster- or emergency-related work on critical infrastructure in the State.
(6) (A) “Out-of-state business” means a business entity that, except for disaster- or emergency-related work, has no presence in the State and conducts no business in the State whose services are requested pursuant to a Mutual Assistance Agreement by a registered business or by a State or local government for purposes of performing disaster- or emergency-related work on critical infrastructure in the State.

“Out-of-state business” also includes a business entity that is affiliated with a registered business in the State solely through common ownership.

An out-of-state business has no registrations or tax filings or nexus in the State other than disaster- or emergency-related work during the tax year immediately preceding the declared State disaster or emergency.

“Out-of-state employee” means an employee who does not work in the State, except for disaster- or emergency-related work during the disaster response period.

“Registered business in the State” or “registered business” means a business entity that is currently registered with the Secretary of State to do business in the State prior to the declared State disaster or emergency.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 51

, § A.1., eff. June 3, 2015.

§ 1702.
Obligations after disaster response period.

Business and employee status during the disaster response period.

An out-of-state business that conducts operations within the State for purposes of performing work or services related to a declared State disaster or emergency during the disaster response period shall not be considered to have established a level of presence that would require that business to register, file, or remit State or local taxes or that would require that business or its out-of-state employees to be subject to any State licensing or registration requirements.
(1) (A) An out-of-state business that conducts operations within the State for purposes of performing work or services related to a declared State disaster or emergency during the disaster response period shall not be considered to have established a level of presence that would require that business to register, file, or remit State or local taxes or that would require that business or its out-of-state employees to be subject to any State licensing or registration requirements.

This includes any State or local business licensing or registration requirements or State and local taxes or fees, including unemployment insurance, State or local occupational licensing fees, ad valorem tax on equipment brought into the State temporarily for use during the disaster response period and subsequently removed from the State, and Public Utility Commission or Secretary of State licensing and regulatory requirements.

For purposes of any State or local tax on or measured by, in whole or in part, net or gross income or receipts, all activity of the out-of-state business that is conducted in this State pursuant to this chapter shall be disregarded with respect to any filing requirements for such tax, including the filing required for a unitary or combined group of which the out-of-state business may be a part.

For the purpose of apportioning income, revenue, or receipts, the performance by an out-of-state business of any work in accordance with this section shall not be sourced to or shall not otherwise impact or increase the amount of income, revenue, or receipts apportioned to this State.

An out-of-state employee shall not be considered to have established residency or a presence in the State that would require that person or that person’s employer to file and pay income taxes or to be subjected to tax withholdings or to file and pay any other State or local tax or fee during the disaster response period.
(2) (A) An out-of-state employee shall not be considered to have established residency or a presence in the State that would require that person or that person’s employer to file and pay income taxes or to be subjected to tax withholdings or to file and pay any other State or local tax or fee during the disaster response period.

This includes any related State or local employer withholding and remittance obligations, but does not include any transaction taxes or fees as described in subsection (b) of this section.

Transaction taxes and fees. An out-of-state business and an out-of-state employee shall be required to pay transaction taxes and fees, including fuel tax and sales and use tax on materials or services consumed or used in the State subject to sales and use tax, rooms and meals tax, car rental taxes or fees that the out-of-state affiliated business or out-of-state employee purchases for use or consumption in the State during the disaster response period, unless such taxes are otherwise exempted during a disaster response period. An out-of-state business making retail sales of tangible personal property during the disaster response period shall be subject to all sales tax registration, collection, reporting, and other requirements set forth in 32 V.S.A. chapter 233.

Business or employee activity after disaster response period. An out-of-state business or out-of-state employee that remains in the State after the disaster response period will become subject to the State’s normal standards for establishing presence, residency, or doing business in the State and will therefore become responsible for any business or employee tax requirements that ensue.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 51

, § A.1., eff. June 3, 2015; amended

2017, No. 53

, § 12.

§ 1703.
Administration.

Notification of out-of-state business during the disaster response period.

The out-of-state business that enters the State shall, upon request, provide to the Secretary of State a statement that it is in the State for purposes of responding to the disaster or emergency, which statement shall include the business’s name, state of domicile, principal business address, federal tax identification number, date of entry, and contact information.

A registered business in the State shall, upon request, provide the information required in subdivision (1) of this subsection for any affiliate that enters the State that is an out-of-state business.

The notification shall also include contact information for the registered business in the State.

Notification of intent to remain in State. An out-of-state business or an out-of-state employee that remains in the State after the disaster response period shall complete State and local registration, licensing, and filing requirements that ensue as a result of establishing the requisite business presence or residency in the State applicable under the existing law.

Procedures. The Secretary of State may adopt necessary rules, develop and issue forms or online processes, and maintain and make available an annual record of any designations pursuant to this chapter to carry out these administrative procedures.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 51

, § A.1., eff. June 3, 2015.